engine/dictionaries/cs_CZ/cs_CZ.aff
SFX R Y 25
SFX R   ý           ě          [bpvmfdnt]ý
SFX R   ý           e          [lsz]ý
SFX R   hý          ze         [^c]hý
SFX R   chý         še         chý
SFX R   rý          ře         rý
SFX R   ý           y          [sc]ký
SFX R   ký          ce         [^sc]ký
SFX R   í           ě          [dnt]í
SFX R   í           e          [zž]í
SFX R   í           eji        čí
SFX R   ší          i          [eě]jší
SFX R   0           ě          [bdfmnptvw]
SFX R   g           ze         g
SFX R   ch          še         ch
SFX R   h           ze         [^c]h
SFX R   k           ce         k
SFX R   0           e          [cčjlřsšzž]
SFX R   r           ře         r
SFX R   o           ě          [bdfmnptvw]o
SFX R   go          ze         go
SFX R   cho         še         cho
SFX R   ho          ze         [^c]ho
SFX R   ko          ce         ko
SFX R   o           e          [cčjlřsšzž]o
SFX R   ro          ře         ro
